public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi '-er inregolari ((r[ei])èser)
# themeT1 + er/p0
SFX p0 Y 347
SFX p0 0 e èser
SFX p0 0 ge èser
SFX p0 0 me/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 0 mene/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 er ar èser
SFX p0 er are èser
SFX p0 er arge èser
SFX p0 er arme/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 er armene/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 er i/E0E1E2F0F1F2L0N0 èser
SFX p0 er ime/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 er imene/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 ser ra/F0F1F2J0N0 èser
SFX p0 ser rane/K0 èser
SFX p0 ser rau/O0 èser
SFX p0 ser re/J0 èser
SFX p0 ser relo/B0 èser
SFX p0 ser rene/K0 èser
SFX p0 ser reƚo/B0 èser
SFX p0 ser ri/J0L0N0 èser
SFX p0 ser rimo/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 ser ritu/M0 èser
SFX p0 ser ro/J0 èser
SFX p0 ser rone/K0 èser
SFX p0 ser rímoe/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser astando/E0E1E2 èser
SFX p0 èser astanto/E0E1E2 èser
SFX p0 èser eren/J0 [ae]r
SFX p0 èser eren/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser erene/K0 [ae]r
SFX p0 èser erense [ae]r
SFX p0 èser erion/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser erione/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser erionme/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 èser eriven/J0 [aei]r
SFX p0 èser eriven/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser erivene/K0 [ae]r
SFX p0 èser erivense [ae]r
SFX p0 èser erivion/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser erivione/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser erivionse èser
SFX p0 èser erivié/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser eriviéu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser erivon/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser erivone/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser erivonse èser
SFX p0 èser erié/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser eriéu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser eriónmene/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 èser eron/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser erone/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser eronme/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 èser erímoe/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser erónmene/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 èser esendo/E0E1E2 èser
SFX p0 èser esente/T0I0 èser
SFX p0 èser esento/E0E1E2 èser
SFX p0 èser esesto/B0I0 èser
SFX p0 èser esudo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser eséndome/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 èser eséndomene/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 èser eséntome/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 èser eséntomene/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 èser esí/E0E1E2F0F1F2L0N0 èser
SFX p0 èser esú/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser etu/M0 èser
SFX p0 èser furese/I0T0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesen/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesense èser
SFX p0 èser furesiede/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesiege/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesion/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesione/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesionse èser
SFX p0 èser furesisen/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesisene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesisense èser
SFX p0 èser furesisiede/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesisiege/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesision/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesisione/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesisionse èser
SFX p0 èser furesisié/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesison/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesisone/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesisonse èser
SFX p0 èser furesié/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesiéu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser fureson/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesone/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser furesonse èser
SFX p0 èser furésimo/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser furésimoe/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser fuse/I0P1P2T0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusen/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusense èser
SFX p0 èser fusiede/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusiege/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusion/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusione/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusionse èser
SFX p0 èser fusisen/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusisene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusisense èser
SFX p0 èser fusisiede/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusisiege/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusision/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusisione/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusisionse èser
SFX p0 èser fusisié/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusison/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusisone/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusisonse èser
SFX p0 èser fusié/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusiéu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser fuson/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusone/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser fusonse èser
SFX p0 èser fúselo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser fúseƚo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser fúsimo/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser fúsimoe/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser jèra/F0F1F2J0N0 èser
SFX p0 èser jèrane/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser jèrau/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser jère/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser jèrelo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser jèreme/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 èser jèremene/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 èser jèrene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser jèreƚo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser jèri/J0L0N0 èser
SFX p0 èser jèrimo/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser jèrimone/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser jèritu/M0 èser
SFX p0 èser jèro/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser jèrone/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser saralo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser sarane/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser saratu/M0 èser
SFX p0 èser sarave/F0F1F2Q1Q2 èser
SFX p0 èser saraƚo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser saremo/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser saren/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sarene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser sarimo/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sarié/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser sariéu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser saron/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sarone/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser sarà/F0F1F2J0L0 èser
SFX p0 èser saràe/F0F1F2 èser
SFX p0 èser saràvelo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser saràvene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser saràveƚo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser sarè/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sarène/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser saré/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser sarémoe/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser saréu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser sarí/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser saría/F0F1F2J0L0 èser
SFX p0 èser saríane/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser saríatu/M0 èser
SFX p0 èser saríe/F0F1F2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser saríelo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser saríene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser saríeƚo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser sarímoe/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser saríu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser sarò/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser saròe/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser selo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser semo/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sen/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepi/F0F1F2L0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepia/E0E1E2 èser
SFX p0 èser sepie/E0E1E2F0F1F2I0J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepiede/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepiege/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepiemo/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepiemo/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepien/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepiene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepimo/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepimo/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepion/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepione/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepiè/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepiène/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepié/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepiémoe/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepiéu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser sepí/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser seralo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser serane/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser seratu/M0 èser
SFX p0 èser serave/F0F1F2Q1Q2 èser
SFX p0 èser seraƚo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser seremo/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser seren/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser serene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser serense èser
SFX p0 èser seresi/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser seresiu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser serimo/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser serion/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser serione/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser serionse èser
SFX p0 èser serisen/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser serisene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser serisense èser
SFX p0 èser serisi/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser serision/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser serisione/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser serisionse èser
SFX p0 èser serisiu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser serisié/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser serisiéu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser serison/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser serisone/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser serisonse èser
SFX p0 èser serié/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser seriéu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser seron/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser serone/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser seronse èser
SFX p0 èser serà/F0F1F2J0L0 èser
SFX p0 èser seràe/F0F1F2 èser
SFX p0 èser seràvelo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser seràvene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser seràveƚo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser serè/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser serène/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser seré/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser serémoe/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser serésimo/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser serésimoe/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser serésitu/M0 èser
SFX p0 èser seréu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser serí/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser sería/F0F1F2J0L0 èser
SFX p0 èser seríane/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser seríatu/M0 èser
SFX p0 èser seríe/F0F1F2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser seríelo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser seríene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser seríeƚo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser serímoe/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser serísitu/M0 èser
SFX p0 èser seríu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser serò/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser seròe/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser setu/M0 èser
SFX p0 èser seu/O0 èser
SFX p0 èser seƚo/B0 èser
SFX p0 èser siando/E0E1E2 èser
SFX p0 èser sianto/E0E1E2 èser
SFX p0 èser sime/G0G1G2 èser
SFX p0 èser simo/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sion/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sione/K0T0 èser
SFX p0 èser sionmi èser
SFX p0 èser sipi/F0F1F2L0 èser
SFX p0 èser sipia/E0E1E2 èser
SFX p0 èser sipie/E0E1E2F0F1F2I0J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sipiede/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser sipiege/N0 èser
SFX p0 èser sipiemo/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sipiemo/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sipien/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sipiene/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser sipimo/E0E1E2J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sipimo/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sipion/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sipione/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser sipiè/J0 èser
SFX p0 èser sipiène/K0 èser
SFX p0 èser sipié/N0 èser
